Utah statutes.
63M-9-201.   Families, Agencies, and Communities Together State Council -- Composition -- Duties -- Interagency case management team.

(1) (a)  There is created within state government the Families, Agencies, and Communities Together State Council composed of:

(i)  the state superintendent of public instruction;

(ii)  the executive director of the Department of Health;

(iii)  the executive director of the Department of Human Services;

(iv)  the state court administrator; and

(v)  the executive director of the Department of Workforce Services.

(b)  The council members listed in Subsection (1)(a) shall appoint to a four-year term the following nonvoting members:

(i)  a representative of community-based service organizations appointed to a four-year term;

(ii)  a parent representative from a rural community; and

(iii)  a parent representative from an urban community.

(c)  If a vacancy occurs with respect to a council member appointed under Subsection (1)(b), council members listed in Subsection (1)(a) shall appoint a replacement for the unexpired term.

(d)  Appointments and reappointments under Subsections (1)(b) and (c) shall be made within 60 days of a vacancy.

(2) (a)  The council shall annually elect a chair from its membership.

(b)  All voting members of the council are necessary to constitute a quorum at any meeting.

(c)  The action of a majority of a quorum is the action of the council, except that a unanimous vote of the council is required to appoint or remove a nonvoting council member.

(d)  The council shall meet quarterly or more frequently as determined by the chair.

(3)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(4)  The council shall:

(a)  provide leadership to increase and enhance efficient and effective services to Utah's children and youth at risk by:

(i)  cooperatively planning, funding, monitoring, evaluating, and marketing innovative and individualized service delivery and funding strategies;

(ii)  recommending legislative, executive, and judicial policy and procedural changes, including joint budget proposals as described in Section 63J-1-201;

(iii)  developing incentives and strategies to increase family involvement, collaboration, and public-private partnerships in the planning and delivery of services at the state and local level;

(iv)  promoting prevention and early intervention services;

(v)  increasing public understanding of and advocating for the needs of Utah's children and youth who are at risk; and

(vi)  establishing policies to remove administrative barriers to collaboration in communities;

(b)  compile and disseminate information regarding effective service delivery and funding strategies for replication;

(c)  receive and act upon recommendations of the steering committee;

(d)  approve the establishment of collaborative service delivery systems under Section 63M-9-402 and adopt performance goals for those systems;

(e)  recommend to the governor for each fiscal year funds contained in an agency’s base budget and building block request that can be identified for collaborative service delivery systems established under Section 63M-9-402;

(f)  develop model administrative and governance structures to be established by communities that at least:

(i)  ensure accountability for public funds;

(ii)  are voluntarily adopted and modified by communities, based on community needs;

(iii)  ensure collaboration on matters of policy and administrative processes in operating programs under this chapter between the state, school districts, and counties;

(iv)  establish a board consisting of heads of state and local government agencies, private agencies, and school districts that provide services under this chapter; and

(v)  ensure equity in the scope, duration, and level of services throughout a prescribed geographical area;

(g)  review the structure and function of the steering committee before December 1, 1999, to determine the effectiveness of the steering committee in:

(i)  achieving the purposes and carrying out the responsibilities of the committee; and

(ii)  assisting communities to establish collaborative service delivery systems;

(h)  forward to the Legislature for the 2000 General Session recommendations for restructuring the size, membership, and function of the steering committee based on the review conducted under Subsection (4)(g); and

(i)  report to the governor and the Legislature on an annual basis.

(5)  The council may, through contracts that provide funding for programs under this chapter, give incentives to communities to establish an administrative and governance structure that meets the requirements of Subsection (4)(f) and to designate the geographical area within which that administrative and governance structure will operate.

(6)  The council shall ensure that projects selected under Section 63M-9-401 have outcomes that:

(a)  focus all project activities on the prevention of academic failure and social misbehaviors;

(b)  involve parents in planning, implementation, and evaluation of services;

(c)  allow frequent opportunities for planning between teachers, parents, school administrators, and representatives of agencies and community-based service organizations that provide services; and

(d)  provide frequent monitoring and assessment of each child's and youth's progress.

(7) (a)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the council shall make rules to ensure cooperative development of individualized and coordinated service plans by local interagency councils and case management teams for children or youth at risk and their families who receive services under this chapter.

(b)  For purposes of developing and implementing individualized and coordinated plans, the members of the local interagency councils and case management teams shall be considered to be employees of each agency represented on the team and entitled to review and discuss agency records as necessary in planning and providing services under a plan.

(c)  Records shared by the teams remain the property of the supplying agency and may not be incorporated in the records of another agency unless transferred in accordance with standard procedures for transfer of records of the type in question.



Amended by Chapter 286, 2010 General Session

